Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.245

Transfer of principal to subordinate certificated position—Notice—Procedure.

(1) Any certificated employee of a school district under this section who is first employed as a principal after June 10, 2010, shall be subject to transfer as provided under this section, at the expiration of the term of his or her employment contract, to any subordinate certificated position within the school district. "Subordinate certificated position" as used in this section means any administrative or nonadministrative certificated position for which the annual compensation is less than the position currently held by the administrator. This section applies only to school districts with an annual average student enrollment of more than thirty-five thousand full-time equivalent students.

(2) During the first three consecutive school years of employment as a principal by the school district, or during the first full school year of such employment in the case of a principal who has been previously employed as a principal by another school district in the state for three or more consecutive school years, the transfer of the principal to a subordinate certificated position may be made by a determination of the superintendent that the best interests of the school district would be served by the transfer.

(3) Commencing with the fourth consecutive school year of employment as a principal, or the second consecutive school year of such employment in the case of a principal who has been previously employed as a principal by another school district in the state for three or more consecutive school years, the transfer of the principal to a subordinate certificated position shall be based on the superintendent's determination that the results of the evaluation of the principal's performance using the evaluative criteria and rating system established under RCW 28A.405.100 provide a valid reason for the transfer without regard to whether there is probable cause for the transfer. If a valid reason is shown, it shall be deemed that the transfer is reasonably related to the principal's performance. No probationary period is required. However, provision of support and an attempt at remediation of the performance of the principal, as defined by the superintendent, are required for a determination by the superintendent under this subsection that the principal should be transferred to a subordinate certificated position.

(4) Any superintendent transferring a principal under this section to a subordinate certificated position shall notify that principal in writing on or before May 15th before the beginning of the school year of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by the end of the regular legislative session for that year, then notification shall be no later than June 15th. The notification shall state the reason or reasons for the transfer and shall identify the subordinate certificated position to which the principal will be transferred. The notification shall be served upon the principal personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein.

(5) Any principal so notified may request to the president or chair of the board of directors of the district, in writing and within ten days after receiving notice, an opportunity to meet informally with the board of directors in an executive session for the purpose of requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the superintendent, and shall be given such opportunity. The board, upon receipt of such request, shall schedule the meeting for no later than the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board, and shall give the principal written notice at least three days before the meeting of the date, time, and place of the meeting. At the meeting the principal shall be given the opportunity to refute any evidence upon which the determination was based and to make any argument in support of his or her request for reconsideration. The principal and the board may invite their respective legal counsel to be present and to participate at the meeting. The board shall notify the principal in writing of its final decision within ten days following its meeting with the principal. No appeal to the courts shall lie from the final decision of the board of directors to transfer a principal to a subordinate certificated position.

(6) This section provides the exclusive means for transferring a certificated employee first employed by a school district under this section as a principal after June 10, 2010, to a subordinate certificated position at the expiration of the term of his or her employment contract.

[ 2016 c 85 s 4; 2010 c 235 s 302.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 85: See note following RCW 28A.405.210.

Finding—2010 c 235: "The legislature finds that the presence of highly effective principals in schools has never been more important than it is today. To enable students to meet high academic standards, principals must lead and encourage teams of teachers and support staff to work together, align curriculum and instruction, use student data to target instruction and intervention strategies, and serve as the chief school officer with parents and the community. Greater responsibility should come with greater authority over personnel, budgets, resource allocation, and programs. But greater responsibility also comes with greater accountability for outcomes. Washington is putting into place an updated and rigorous system of evaluating principal performance, one that will measure what matters. This system will never be truly effective unless the results are meaningfully used." [ 2010 c 235 s 301.]